Washington statutes.
RCW 43.330.330

Funding energy efficiency improvements—Risk reduction mechanisms—Legislative intent.

(1) The legislature finds that the creation and use of risk reduction mechanisms will promote greater involvement of local financial institutions and other financing mechanisms in funding energy efficiency improvements and will achieve greater leverage of state and federal dollars. Risk reduction mechanisms will allow financial institutions to lend to a broader pool of applicants on more attractive terms, such as potentially lower rates and longer loan terms. Placing a portion of funds in long-term risk reduction mechanisms will support a sustained level of energy efficiency investment by financial institutions while providing funding to projects quickly.

(2) It is the intent of the legislature to leverage new federal funding aimed at promoting energy efficiency projects, improving energy efficiency, and increasing family-wage jobs. To this end, the legislature intends to invest a portion of all federal funding, subject to federal requirements, for energy efficiency projects in financial mechanisms that will provide for maximum leverage of financing.

[ 2009 c 379 s 206.]

NOTES:

Finding—Intent—Effective date—2009 c 379: See notes following RCW 70A.50.010.